Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA ENTREPRENEURSHIP TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of employment and economic development must establish a Minnesota Entrepreneurship Task Force to assess and make recommendations to the legislature regarding the successfulness of current programs, development of new programs, potential permitting and licensing reforms, and barriers to starting a business in Minnesota discovered by the task force with the goal of making Minnesota the easiest and most rewarding state in the nation to start, own, and grow a business. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must consist of the commissioner, or a designee, and the following additional ten members appointed by the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) two members with direct experience in entrepreneurship, either as an entrepreneur or with assisting entrepreneurs in starting a business; new text end new text begin (2) two members representing small and large business owners, respectively; new text end new text begin (3) one representative of organized labor; new text end new text begin (4) one representative of registered apprenticeship programs; new text end new text begin (5) one representative of grades kindergarten through 12 education; new text end new text begin (6) one representative of higher education; new text end new text begin (7) one representative of career and technical education; and new text end new text begin (8) one representative with expertise in business financing. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of labor and industry, or a designee, must also be a member of the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Administration; terms of membership. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall convene the first meeting of the task force by September 15, 2027, and provide staff support to the task force. Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 6, governs the terms and removal of members of the advisory task force. Members of the task force serve without compensation or per diem. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) At a minimum, the task force shall, in making the findings and recommendations required for the report in subdivision 5, focus on how best to: new text end new text begin (1) create robust support systems for small business owners at every stage, from launch through succession; new text end new text begin (2) reduce the friction of starting and running a business in Minnesota through streamlined licensing and permitting and technical assistance; new text end new text begin (3) provide access to financial capital, mentors, and support systems; new text end new text begin (4) deliver entrepreneurship education on business practices for students and adults; new text end new text begin (5) provide apprenticeship supports; and new text end new text begin (6) address real life barriers to entrepreneurship such as access to health care and child care. new text end new text begin (b) Additionally, the task force must analyze and develop recommendations on the success of current programs, the development of new programs, and permitting and licensing reforms to address the issues listed in paragraph (a) and any other barriers to starting a business in Minnesota identified by the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin On or before February 15, 2028, the task force shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over economic development on the findings and recommendations of the task force. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day after submitting the report under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end